Illinois, session 104th, SB2685.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Unmasked Federal Enforcement Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8    (1) The use of masked, unidentified federal agents in 9public enforcement actions has generated fear, confusion, and 10distrust in communities across Illinois, particularly among 11immigrant residents.12    (2) Illinois Attorney General Kwame Raoul, along with a 13coalition of state attorneys general, has urged Congress to 14prohibit such practices as contrary to transparency and 15accountability standards traditionally observed by law 16enforcement.17    (3) Federal legislation such as the "No Secret Police Act 18of 2025" has been introduced to require clear identification 19of Department of Homeland Security personnel and to ban face 20coverings during detentions and arrests.21    (4) Illinois has a compelling interest in protecting civil 22liberties, preventing impersonation of officers, and ensuring 23public safety during any law enforcement activity carried out   SB2685- 2 -LRB104 14519 RLC 27659 b1within its borders. 2    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:3    "Covered federal officer or agent" means any officer, 4employee, or contractor of the U.S. Immigration and Customs 5Enforcement, Enforcement and Removal Operations, Homeland 6Security Investigations, or any other component of the U.S. 7Department of Homeland Security engaged in immigration-related 8arrests, detentions, or field investigations in Illinois.9    "Enforcement action" means an arrest, detention, search, 10seizure, or other field operation involving interaction with 11members of the public.12    "Face covering" means any mask, balaclava, scarf, shield, 13or other item worn primarily to conceal the identity of the 14wearer, but does not include equipment necessary for 15respiratory protection in a declared public health emergency 16when the officer's name and agency remain clearly displayed.  17    Section 15. Prohibition on concealing identity. 18    (a) A covered federal officer or agent shall not wear a 19face covering or otherwise intentionally conceal the officer's 20or agent's face or identity while conducting or participating 21in an enforcement action in this State.22    (b) A temporary face covering may be used only when the 23supervising officer documents, in writing, an immediate and 24specific safety threat that cannot be mitigated by other   SB2685- 3 -LRB104 14519 RLC 27659 b1means.2    (c) Any use of the exception in subsection (b) must be 3reported to the Office of the Illinois Attorney General within 47 calendar days, including:5        (1) the date, time, and location of the enforcement 6    action;7        (2) the nature of the documented threat; and8        (3) steps taken to minimize concealment and protect 9    the public. 10    Section 20. Uniform and identification requirements. 11    (a) During an enforcement action, a covered federal 12officer or agent shall display:13        (1) a clearly visible name or unique identification 14    number; and15        (2) a clearly visible insignia or marking identifying 16    the officer's federal agency.17    (b) Use of unmarked uniforms or equipment that obscures 18agency affiliation is prohibited during public-facing 19enforcement activity. 20    Section 25. State and local cooperation. 21    (a) No State agency, unit of local government, or law 22enforcement officer shall materially assist, coordinate with, 23or provide resources to any enforcement action that violates 24Sections 15 or 20 of this Act.  SB2685- 4 -LRB104 14519 RLC 27659 b1    (b) This Section does not prohibit cooperation required by 2a valid federal court order. 3    Section 30. Enforcement; Attorney General. 4    (a) The Attorney General may receive and investigate 5complaints of violations of this Act, may issue subpoenas, and 6may bring a civil action for declaratory or injunctive relief 7in any court of competent jurisdiction.8    (b) The Attorney General shall publish an annual public 9report summarizing complaints and compliance trends.  10    Section 35. Whistleblower protection. No employee or 11contractor of a State or local governmental entity shall be 12retaliated against for reporting a violation of this Act to 13the Attorney General. 14    Section 40. Home rule. The regulation of face coverings 15and identity under this Act are exclusive powers and functions 16of the State. A home rule unit may not regulate the matters 17covered by this Act. This Act is a denial and limitation of 18home rule powers and functions under subsection (h) of Section 196 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 20    Section 45. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 21severable. If any provision or its application is held 22invalid, the remaining provisions are not affected.   SB2685- 5 -LRB104 14519 RLC 27659 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.